North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12 Corrections, Parole, and Probation
CHAPTER 12-52 Aftercare Program for Youth Correctional Center

12-52-01.
Department of corrections and rehabilitation to administer juvenile aftercare program and other treatment and rehabilitation programs.

The division of juvenile services with the approval of the director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation may provide a juvenile aftercare program and other treatment and rehabilitation programs and may contract with public and private agencies to provide services for persons committed to the division of juvenile services and may establish facilities in, and rules under, which such persons may receive services.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 181, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 11291; S.L. 1925, ch. 196, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 11291; R.C. 1943, § 12-5201; S.L. 1975, ch. 109, § 2; 1979, ch. 174, § 2; 1989, ch. 156, § 42; 1989, ch. 157, § 1.

Collateral References.

Right to notice and hearing before revocation of probation or suspension of sentence, parole or conditional pardon, 29 A.L.R.2d 1074.

Acquittal in criminal proceeding as precluding revocation of parole on same charge, 76 A.L.R.3d 578.

Validity of statutes prohibiting or restricting parole, probation, or suspension of sentence in cases of violent crimes, 100 A.L.R.3d 431.

When is a person in custody of governmental authorities for purpose of exercise of state remedy of habeas corpus—modern cases, 26 A.L.R.4th 455.

12-52-02.
Aftercare granted on recommendation of superintendent. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

No aftercare program may be provided for any person committed to the North Dakota youth correctional center or placed under the guardianship, control, and custody of the superintendent, unless the superintendent recommends the program to the director of the division of juvenile services and some suitable person will receive the person to be placed in the aftercare program under conditions approved by the superintendent. Nothing in this chapter prevents the placing of any person into the person’s own home or into a licensed foster home under any program administered by the department of human services.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 181, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 11292; R.C. 1943, § 12-5202; S.L. 1959, ch. 134, § 1; 1961, ch. 131, § 3; 1975, ch. 109, § 3; 1989, ch. 156, § 43; 1995, ch. 120, § 25.

Cross-References.

Foster homes, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-11.

12-52-02.
Aftercare granted on recommendation of superintendent. [Effective September 1, 2022]

No aftercare program may be provided for any person committed to the North Dakota youth correctional center or placed under the guardianship, control, and custody of the superintendent, unless the superintendent recommends the program to the director of the division of juvenile services and some suitable person will receive the person to be placed in the aftercare program under conditions approved by the superintendent. Nothing in this chapter prevents the placing of any person into the person’s own home or into a licensed foster home under any program administered by the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 181, § 2; C.L. 1913, § 11292; R.C. 1943, § 12-5202; S.L. 1959, ch. 134, § 1; 1961, ch. 131, § 3; 1975, ch. 109, § 3; 1989, ch. 156, § 43; 1995, ch. 120, § 25; 2021, ch. 352, § 17, effective September 1, 2022.

12-52-03.
Recommitment to the youth correctional center for violation of aftercare rules.

A person placed in an aftercare program must be under the guardianship and control of the director of the division of juvenile services and is subject, at any time until the expiration of the time for which the person was committed, to be taken into actual custody and returned to the North Dakota youth correctional center. The director may enforce the rules and regulations made for the administration of aftercare programs and the placement of students in them, and when the director is satisfied that a person placed in an aftercare program has violated any of the rules or regulations, the director may order that person to be taken into actual custody and returned to the North Dakota youth correctional center and to be detained therein until the expiration of the time for which the person was committed, or until the person is again placed in an aftercare program. The director shall maintain a record of any such order, and a certified copy of the order may be delivered to any peace officer, or any officer or employee of the North Dakota youth correctional center, for service and return. It is the duty of the officer or employee to receive the order and to apprehend and immediately deliver the person named in the order to the superintendent of the North Dakota youth correctional center.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 181, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 11293; R.C. 1943, § 12-5203; S.L. 1975, ch. 109, § 4; 1989, ch. 156, § 44; 1995, ch. 120, § 25.

12-52-04.
Officer’s or employee’s return on order of recommitment.

The officer or employee executing an order of the director of the division of juvenile services for the apprehension and return of a person to the North Dakota youth correctional center shall endorse on the order a return of the officer’s doings thereunder and deliver the same, together with the person named therein, to the superintendent of the center. The superintendent shall give to the officer or employee a certificate acknowledging the receipt of the person, order, and return.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 181, § 4; C.L. 1913, § 11294; R.C. 1943, § 12-5204; S.L. 1975, ch. 109, § 5; 1989, ch. 156, § 45; 1995, ch. 120, § 25.

12-52-05.
Officer’s fee on recommitment — Exception.

The fee of any officer, except an officer or employee of the North Dakota youth correctional center, executing an order of the director of the division of juvenile services for the apprehension and return of a person to the North Dakota youth correctional center must be the same as that for like service in criminal actions.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 181, § 4; C.L. 1913, § 11294; R.C. 1943, § 12-5205; S.L. 1975, ch. 109, § 6; 1989, ch. 156, § 46; 1995, ch. 120, § 25.

12-52-06.
Parole violator guilty of misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673; 1975, ch. 109, § 8.

12-52-07.
Discharge for good conduct.

The director of the division of juvenile services may discharge any student from the North Dakota youth correctional center at any time upon satisfactory evidence of reformation and as a reward for good conduct and diligence in study. If the student has no parent, guardian, or other person to whom to return, the director shall arrange for and procure some suitable person to receive, employ, and care for the person so discharged.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 164, § 18; R.C. 1895, § 8587; R.C. 1899, § 8587; R.C. 1905, § 10407; C.L. 1913, § 11288; S.L. 1925, ch. 196, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 11288; R.C. 1943, § 12-5207; S.L. 1975, ch. 109, § 7; 1989, ch. 156, § 47; 1995, ch. 120, § 25.